Utah statutes.
31A-23a-806.   Prohibited acts.
(1)  The reinsurance intermediary-manager may not cede retrocessions on behalf
of the reinsurer, except that the reinsurance intermediary-manager may cede
facultative retrocessions pursuant to obligatory facultative agreements if the
contract with the reinsurer contains reinsurance underwriting guidelines for
facultative retrocessions.  The guidelines shall include a list of reinsurers
with which automatic agreements are in effect, and for each listed reinsurer,
the coverages and amounts or percentages that may be reinsured, and commission
schedules.
(2)  The reinsurance intermediary-manager may not commit the reinsurer to
participate in reinsurance syndicates.
(3)  The reinsurance intermediary-manager may not appoint any producer without
assuring that the producer is lawfully licensed to transact the type of
reinsurance for which he is appointed.
(4)  The reinsurance intermediary-manager may not, without prior approval of
the reinsurer, pay or commit the reinsurer to pay a claim, net of
retrocessions, that exceeds the lesser of an amount specified by the reinsurer
or 1% of the reinsurer's policyholder's surplus as of December 31 of the last
complete calendar year.
(5)  The reinsurance intermediary-manager may not collect any payment from a
retrocessionaire or commit the reinsurer to any claim settlement with a
retrocessionaire, without prior approval of the reinsurer.  If prior approval
is given, a report must be promptly forwarded to the reinsurer.
(6)  The reinsurance intermediary-manager may not jointly employ an individual
who is employed by the reinsurer unless the reinsurance intermediary-manager
is under common control with the reinsurer subject to Title 31A, Chapter 16,
Insurance Holding Companies.
(7)  The reinsurance intermediary-manager may not appoint a subreinsurance
intermediary-manager.
